District of Columbia statutes.
50-2206.52c

Admissibility of chemical test results for a criminal proceeding; blood or urine.

The results of chemical testing pertaining to blood or urine used to determine whether the person’s specimens contained alcohol or a drug or any combination thereof may be admissible as evidence in a criminal proceeding if the chemical testing was performed at a forensic laboratory, hospital, other equivalent medical facility, or at a laboratory contracted by a hospital or medical facility to perform chemical testing for specimens supplied by the hospital or equivalent medical facility.

History

Sept. 14, 1982, D.C. Law 4-145, § 3q-3
as added Apr. 20, 2013, D.C. Law 19-260, § 4(b), 60 DCR 1292

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-260 added this section.

Editor's Notes

Section 5 of D.C. Law 19-260 provided that the act shall apply as of the effective date of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Breath Testing Program Amendment Act of 2012, signed by the Mayor on October 24, 2012 (D.C. Act 19-489; 59 DCR 12957), which became D.C. Law 19-266, effective April 27, 2013.